Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,185.01
Remedial action plan; notice; hearing.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall issue public notice of its intent to approve a voluntary remedial action plan pursuant to section 81-15,185 in a local newspaper of general circulation in the area affected and make the remedial action plan available to the public. The public shall have thirty days from the date of publication during which any person may submit written comments to the department regarding the proposed remedial action. Such person may also request or petition the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment, in writing, for a hearing and state the nature of the issues to be raised. The director shall hold a public hearing if the comments, request, or petition raise legal, policy, or discretionary questions of general application and significant public interest exists.

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 10;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 142;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 432.